hu: Mért koleszterin analit: Koleszterin arány; Glükóz; HDL koleszterin; Hemoglobin; Keton testek; LDL koleszterin; Laktát; Össz-koleszterin (TC); Trigliceridek; Húgysav; Egyéb
tr: Ölçülen kolesterol analiti: Kolesterol oranı; Glikoz; HDL kolesterol; Hemoglobin; Keton cisimleri; LDL kolesterol; Laktat; Toplam kolesterol (TK); Trigliseritler; Ürik asit; Diğer
de: Gemessener Cholesterin-Analyt: Cholesterinverhältnis; Glukose; HDL-Cholesterin; Hämoglobin; Ketonkörper; LDL-Cholesterin; Laktat; Gesamtcholesterin (TC); Triglyzeride; Harnsäure; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Meraný cholesterolový analyt: Pomer cholesterolu; Glukóza; HDL cholesterol; Hemoglobín; Ketónové telieska; LDL cholesterol; Laktát; Celkový cholesterol (TC); Triglyceridy; Kyselina močová; Iné
fi: Mitattu kolesterolianalyytti: Kolesterolisuhde; Glukoosi; HDL-kolesteroli; Hemoglobiini; Ketoaineet; LDL-kolesteroli; Laktaatti; Kokonaiskolesteroli (TC); Triglyseridit; Virtsahappo; Muu
el: Μετρούμενος αναλύτης χοληστερόλης: Αναλογία χοληστερίνης; Γλυκόζη; HDL χοληστερίνη; Αιμοσφαιρίνη; Κετονικά σώματα; LDL χοληστερίνη; Γαλακτικό; Ολική χοληστερίνη (TC); Τριγλυκερίδια; Ουρικό οξύ; Άλλο
fr: Élément de cholestérol mesuré: Ratio de cholestérol; Glucose; Cholestérol HDL; Hémoglobine; Corps cétoniques; Cholestérol LDL; Lactate; Cholestérol total (CT); Triglycérides; Acide urique; Autre
nb: Kolesterolanalytt målt: Kolesterolforhold; Glukose; HDL-kolesterol; Hemoglobin; Ketonlegemer; LDL-kolesterol; Laktat; Totalkolesterol (TC); Triglyserider; Urinsyre; Annet
it: Analita del colesterolo misurato: Rapporto colesterolo; Glucosio; Colesterolo HDL; Emoglobina; Corpi chetonici; Colesterolo LDL; Lattato; Colesterolo totale (CT); Trigliceridi; Acido urico; Altro
pt-BR: Analito de colesterol medido: Razão de colesterol; Glicose; Colesterol HDL; Hemoglobina; Corpos cetônicos; Colesterol LDL; Lactato; Colesterol total (CT); Triglicerídeos; Ácido úrico; Outro
sl-SI: Merjen analit holesterola: Razmerje holesterola; Glukoza; HDL holesterol; Hemoglobin; Ketonska telesa; LDL holesterol; Laktat; Skupni holesterol (TC); Trigliceridi; Sečna kislina; Drugo
ru: Измеряемый аналит холестерина: Коэффициент холестерина; Глюкоза; ЛПВП холестерин; Гемоглобин; Кетоновые тела; ЛПНП холестерин; Лактат; Общий холестерин (ОХ); Триглицериды; Мочевая кислота; Другой
vi: Chất phân tích cholesterol được đo: Tỷ lệ cholesterol; Glucose; Cholesterol HDL; Hemoglobin; Thể ketone; Cholesterol LDL; Lactate; Cholesterol toàn phần (TC); Triglyceride; Axit uric; Khác
zh-TW: 測量的膽固醇分析物: 膽固醇比率; 血糖; 高密度脂蛋白膽固醇; 血紅蛋白; 酮體; 低密度脂蛋白膽固醇; 乳酸; 總膽固醇; 三酸甘油脂; 尿酸; 其他
hr-HR: Izmjereni analit kolesterola: Omjer kolesterola; Glukoza; HDL kolesterol; Hemoglobin; Ketonska tijela; LDL kolesterol; Laktat; Ukupni kolesterol (TC); Trigliceridi; Mokraćna kiselina; Ostalo
nl: Gemeten cholesterolanalyt: Cholesterol verhouding; Glucose; HDL cholesterol; Hemoglobine; Ketonlichamen; LDL cholesterol; Lactaat; Totaal cholesterol (TC); Triglyceriden; Urinezuur; Andere
ja: コレステロール測定分析物: コレステロール比; グルコース; HDLコレステロール; ヘモグロビン; ケトン体; LDLコレステロール; 乳酸; 総コレステロール（TC）; トリグリセリド; 尿酸; その他
pl: Oznaczane parametry cholesterolu: Stosunek cholesterolu; Glukoza; Cholesterol HDL; Hemoglobina; Ciała ketonowe; Cholesterol LDL; Mleczan; Cholesterol całkowity (TC); Triglicerydy; Kwas moczowy; Inne
bg-BG: Измерван холестеролен аналит: Съотношение на холестерола; Глюкоза; HDL холестерол; Хемоглобин; Кетонни тела; LDL холестерол; Лактат; Общ холестерол (TC); Триглицериди; Пикочна киселина; Други
en: Cholesterol analyte measured: Cholesterol ratio; Glucose; HDL cholesterol; Hemoglobin; Ketone bodies; LDL cholesterol; Lactate; Total cholesterol (TC); Triglycerides; Uric acid; Other
sv: Mätt kolesterolanalyt: Kolesterolkvot; Glukos; HDL-kolesterol; Hemoglobin; Ketonkroppar; LDL-kolesterol; Laktat; Totalkolesterol (TC); Triglycerider; Urinsyra; Övrigt
th: สารคอเลสเตอรอลที่วัด: อัตราส่วนคอเลสเตอรอล; น้ำตาลกลูโคส; เอชดีแอลคอเลสเตอรอล; ฮีโมโกลบิน; สารคีโตน; แอลดีแอลคอเลสเตอรอล; แลกเทต; คอเลสเตอรอลรวม (ทีซี); ไตรกลีเซอไรด์; กรดยูริก; อื่นๆ
es: Analito de colesterol medido: Proporción de colesterol; Glucosa; Colesterol HDL; Hemoglobina; Cuerpos cetónicos; Colesterol LDL; Lactato; Colesterol total (CT); Triglicéridos; Ácido úrico; Otros
ko: 측정된 콜레스테롤 분석물: 콜레스테롤 비율; 포도당; HDL 콜레스테롤; 헤모글로빈; 케톤체; LDL 콜레스테롤; 젖산; 총 콜레스테롤 (TC); 중성지방; 요산; 기타
da: Kolesterolanalysestof målt: Kolesterolforhold; Glukose; HDL-kolesterol; Hæmoglobin; Ketonstoffer; LDL-kolesterol; Laktat; Total kolesterol (TC); Triglycerider; Urinsyre; Andet
pt-PT: Analito de colesterol medido: Rácio de colesterol; Glicose; Colesterol HDL; Hemoglobina; Corpos cetónicos; Colesterol LDL; Lactato; Colesterol total (CT); Triglicéridos; Ácido úrico; Outro
lt-LT: Matuojamas cholesterolio analitas: Cholesterolio santykis; Gliukozė; HDL cholesterolis; Hemoglobinas; Ketoniniai kūnai; LDL cholesterolis; Laktatas; Bendras cholesterolis (TC); Trigliceridai; Šlapimo rūgštis; Kita
zh-CN: 测量的胆固醇分析物: 胆固醇比率; 葡萄糖; 高密度脂蛋白胆固醇; 血红蛋白; 酮体; 低密度脂蛋白胆固醇; 乳酸; 总胆固醇 (TC); 甘油三酯; 尿酸; 其他
ro-RO: Analit colesterol măsurat: Raport de colesterol; Glucoză; Colesterol HDL; Hemoglobină; Corpi cetonici; Colesterol LDL; Lactat; Colesterol total (CT); Trigliceride; Acid uric; Altele
cs: Měřený cholesterolový analyt: Poměr cholesterolu; Glukóza; HDL cholesterol; Hemoglobin; Ketonová tělíska; LDL cholesterol; Laktát; Celkový cholesterol (TC); Triglyceridy; Kyselina močová; Jiné